Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-314
Violations; penalty.

Any person who knowingly violates the provisions of section 68-313 shall be deemed guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1941, c. 174, § 3, p. 684;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 68-340;

R.S.1943, § 68-314;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 126.